District of Columbia statutes.
7-751.04

Eligibility requirements.

Individuals eligible for the Program must:

(a)

Be a citizen or permanent resident of the United States;

(b)

Be a physician, dentist, or other health professional as defined in § 7-751.01;

(c)

Be licensed or eligible to practice in the District of Columbia;

(d)

Submit a completed application to participate in the Program; and

(e)

Have no other obligation for health professional service to the federal, state, or District government, unless such obligation will be completely satisfied prior to the beginning of service under the Program.

Mar. 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-71, § 5, 53 DCR 61
Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 5033(b), 55 DCR 7598
D.C. Law 17-219, in subsec. (a), inserted “or permanent resident”.